Hawaii statutes.
PART V.
PROCEDURE AND DECREE

§571-41 Procedure in children's cases.
(a) Cases of children in proceedings under section 571-11(1) and (2) shall be
heard by the court separate from hearings of adult cases and without a jury.
Stenographic notes or mechanical recordings shall be required as in other civil
cases in the circuit courts, unless the parties waive the right of such record
or the court so orders. The hearings may be conducted in an informal manner
and may be adjourned from time to time.

(b) Except as provided in section 571-84.6,
the general public shall be excluded and only such persons admitted whose
presence is requested by the parent or guardian or as the judge or district
family judge finds to have a direct interest in the case, from the standpoint
of the best interests of the child involved, or in the work of the court;
provided that:

(1) Upon request by a party, hearings initiated
pursuant to chapter 587A may be opened to the public if a judge determines that
doing so would be in the best interests of the child;

(2) Parties involved in hearings initiated pursuant
to chapter 587A shall be allowed to be accompanied by an adult advocate to
provide support, unless the court finds that the presence of the advocate would
not be in the best interests of the child. The advocate need not be a licensed
attorney. The State shall not be required to pay, directly or through
reimbursement, for any fees, costs, or expenses related to the advocate. No
person shall act as an advocate who has an interest in the matter beyond the
protection of the child and the healing and rehabilitation of the family; and

(3) The victim of the alleged violation and all other
witnesses who are younger than eighteen years of age shall be entitled to have
parents, guardians, or one other adult and may have an attorney present while
testifying at or otherwise attending a hearing initiated pursuant to section
571-11(1) or 571-11(2).

Prior to the start of a hearing, the parents,
guardian, or legal custodian, and, when appropriate, the child, the child
victim, or witness shall be notified of the right to be represented by counsel
and the right to remain silent.

(c) Findings of fact by the judge or district
family judge of the validity of the allegations in the petition shall be based
upon a preponderance of evidence admissible in the trial of civil cases except
for petitions alleging the court's jurisdiction under section 571-11(1) which
shall require proof beyond a reasonable doubt in accordance with rules of
evidence applicable to criminal cases; provided that no child who is before the
court under section 571-11(1) shall have admitted against the child any
evidence in violation of the child's rights secured under the constitution of
the United States or the State of Hawaii. In the discretion of the judge or
district family judge the child may be excluded from the hearing at any time.
When more than one child is alleged to have been involved in the same act, the
hearing may be held jointly for the purpose of making a finding as to the
allegations in the petition and then shall be heard separately for the purpose
of disposition except in cases where the children involved have one common
parent.

(d) In the disposition part of the hearing any
relevant and material information, including information contained in a written
report, study, or examination, and the results of a risk and needs assessment
of the child conducted pursuant to section 571-45, shall be admissible, and may
be relied upon to the extent of its probative value; provided that the maker of
the written report, study, or examination shall be subject to both direct and
cross-examination upon demand and when the maker is reasonably available. The
disposition shall be based only upon the admitted evidence, and findings
adverse to the child as to disputed issues of fact shall be based upon a
preponderance of such evidence.

(e) Upon a final adverse disposition, if the
parent or guardian is without counsel the court shall inform the parent or
guardian of the parent's or guardian's right to appeal as provided for in
section 571-54.

(f) The judge, or the senior judge if there is
more than one, may by order confer concurrent jurisdiction on a district court
created under chapter 604 to hear and dispose of cases of violation of traffic
laws or ordinances by children, provision to the contrary in section 571-11 or
elsewhere notwithstanding. The exercise of jurisdiction over children by
district courts shall, nevertheless, be considered noncriminal in procedure and
result in the same manner as though the matter had been adjudicated and
disposed of by a family court. [L 1965, c 232, pt of §1; Supp, §333-19; HRS
§571-41; am L 1973, c 211, §1(e) and c 219, §2; am L 1976, c 85, §9; am L 1980,
c 262, §1; am L 1983, c 199, §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1997, c 317, §3; am L 2004,
c 211, §1; am L 2010, c 135, §7; am L 2014, c 201, §13]

Note

The 2014 amendment applies to delinquent behavior committed
on or after July 1, 2014. L 2014, c 201, §21.

Rules of Court

Juvenile proceedings, see Hawaii Family Court Rules, part D.

Evidence; proof, see HFCR rule 143.

Findings by court, see HFCR rule 52.

Transcripts, see HFCR rule 80.

Case Notes

Preponderance of evidence standard applies only to
adjudicatory and post-adjudicatory proceedings. 61 H. 48, 594 P.2d 1084.

Probation revocation hearing, procedural requirements. 62 H.
70, 610 P.2d 509.

Provision relating to admissibility of evidence at the
dispositional phase of hearing is consistent with due process. 62 H. 70, 610
P.2d 509.

Right to counsel; waiver. 63 H. 162, 623 P.2d 86.

District court has concurrent jurisdiction with family court
in DUI cases where defendant is a minor. 69 H. 455, 746 P.2d 82.

District court may not impose a sentence of imprisonment for
a traffic offense. 70 H. 328, 770 P.2d 418.

Because subsection (c) lacks any express standards governing
the exercise of the court's discretion to join cases or to account for
situations where joinder may result in unfair prejudice to one of the minors,
family court's use of HRPP rules 8, 13, and 14, in and of itself, did not
conflict with subsection (c) and thus, was not reversible error. 79 H. 265
(App.), 900 P.2d 1332.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next